Utah statutes.
77-29-10.   Interstate agreement -- Duty of warden.

It shall be lawful and mandatory upon the warden or other official in charge of a penal or correctional institution in this state to deliver any inmate thereof whenever so required by the operation of the agreement on detainers.

